Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
ARTICLE 4
FINANCING

Section

PART 1 LONG-RANGE HIGHWAY PROGRAM

PART 2 HIGHWAY USERS TAX FUND

PART 3 HIGHWAY ANTICIPATION WARRANTS

PART 4 LAW ENFORCEMENT ASSISTANCE
FUND FOR THE PREVENTION
OF DRUNKEN DRIVING

PART 5 PUBLIC HIGHWAY AUTHORITY LAW

PART 6 REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION
AUTHORITY LAW

PART 7 TRANSPORTATION REVENUE
ANTICIPATION NOTES

PART 8 FUNDING ADVANCEMENT FOR SURFACE TRANSPORTATION AND ECONOMIC RECOVERY

PART 9 HIGH-VISIBILITY DRUNK
DRIVING LAW ENFORCEMENT

PART 10 INTERSTATE RAIL

PART 11 MULTIMODAL TRANSPORTATION
OPTIONS FUNDING

PART 12 CLEAN TRANSIT

PART 13 NONATTAINMENT AREA AIR POLLUTION
MITIGATION ENTERPRISE

PART 14 COLORADO WILDLIFE SAFE PASSAGES